Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.925 is amended to read as follows:
When making a study, the committee may require that testimony be given under oath,
which may be administered by the chair[chairman] or by any person authorized by law to
administer oaths. The committee may require that such testimony or any proceedings of
the committee be recorded by an official court reporter or other competent person, under
oath. The transcript, when written, certified and approved by the recorder and transcriber
as being the direct transcript of the testimony, or proceedings, shall be prima facie a
correct statement of said testimony or proceedings provided that the recorder and
transcriber's signature to such certificate is duly acknowledged by him or her before a
notary public or a judicial official of the Commonwealth.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:50 PM Jacketed